North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 6. Powers and Duties. [Repealed]

§§ 53-43 through 53-51.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

S. 53-43; 1921, c. 4, s. 26; 1923, c. 148, s. 5; C.S., s. 220(a); Ex. Sess. 1924, c. 67; 1925, c. 279; 1927, c. 47, s. 5; 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1933, c. 303; 1935, c. 81, s. 1; c. 82; 1937, c. 154; 1941, c. 77; 1943, c. 234; 1955, c. 590; 1961, c. 954; 1967, c. 789, s. 6; 1969, c. 541, s. 8; c. 1303, ss. 8, 9; 1979, c. 483, s. 4; 1981, c. 671, s. 7; 1983, c. 214, s. 2; 1989, c. 187, s. 5; 1995, c. 129, s. 9; 2011-339, s. 6; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-43.1; 1957, c. 507; 1973, c. 239, s. 2; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-43.2; 1959, c. 1069, s. 1; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-43.3; 1967, c. 789, s. 7; 1973, c. 1127; 1981, c. 671, s. 8; 1989, c. 187, s. 6; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-43.4; 1967, c. 789, s. 7; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-43.5; 1967, c. 789, s. 7; 1981, c. 599, s. 17; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-43.6; 1967, c. 789, s. 7; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-43.7; 1967, c. 789, s. 7; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1311, s. 5; 1997-311, s. 1; 1999-460, ss. 9, 10; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-44; 1935, c. 164; 1937, c. 433; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-44.1; 1957, c. 508; 1973, c. 239, s. 3; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-44.2; 1959, c. 1069, s. 2; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-45; 1935, cc. 71, 378; 1937, c. 333; 1959, c. 364, s. 1; 1961, c. 291; 1971, c. 888; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-46; 1921, c. 4, s. 27; C.S., s. 220(b); 1927, c. 47, s. 6; 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1933, c. 359; 1935, c. 199; 1937, c. 186; 1967, c. 789, s. 8; 1979, c. 483, s. 5; 1995, c. 129, s. 10; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-46.1; 1995, c. 129, s. 11; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-47; 1921, c. 4, s. 28; C.S., s. 220(c); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1935, c. 81, s. 3; 1973, c. 497, s. 7; 1983, c. 214, s. 3; 1991, c. 677, s. 2; 1995, c. 417, s. 1; 1997-181, s. 25; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-48; 1921, c. 4, s. 29; 1923, c. 148, s. 6; C.S., s. 220(d); 1925, c. 119, s. 1; 1927, c. 47, s. 7; 1937, c. 419; 1943, c. 204; 1945, c. 127, s. 1; 1967, c. 789, s. 9; 1979, c. 483, s. 6; 1983, c. 214, s. 4; 2004-171, s. 1; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-49; 1921, c. 4, s. 30; C.S., s. 220(e); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1933, c. 239, s. 1; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-50; 1921, c. 4, s. 31; C.S., s. 220(f); 1967, c. 789, s. 10; 1973, c. 554; 1981, c. 671, s. 9; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-51; 1903, c. 275, s. 29; Rev., s. 232; 1919, c. 58; 1921, c. 4, s. 32; C.S., s. 220(g); 1979, c. 483, s. 7; 1981, c. 671, s. 10; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

§ 53-52.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 599, s. 19.

Cross References.

For present provisions relating to bank’s liability for payment of forged check, see

G.S. 25-4-406

.

§ 53-53.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 599, s. 18.

§§ 53-54 through 53-56.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

S. 53-54; 1921, c. 4, s. 35; C.S., s. 220(j); 1995, c. 129, s. 12; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-55; 1921, c. 4, s. 36; 1923, c. 148, s. 7; C.S., s. 220(k); 1941, c. 268; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-56; 1921, c. 4, s. 37; C.S., s. 220(l); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1939, c. 91, s. 2; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

§§ 53-57,
53-58.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1965, c. 700, s. 2.

Cross References.

For provisions of the UCC as to bank deposits and collections, see

G.S. 25-4-101

to 25-4-504.

§ 53-59.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 677, s. 3.

§§ 53-60 through 53-65.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

S. 53-60; 1921, c. 4, s. 41; C.S., s. 220(p); 1973, c. 239, s. 4; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-61; 1921, c. 4, s. 42; C.S., s. 220(q); repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-62; 1921, c. 4, s. 43; Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 56, s. 2; C.S., s. 220(r); 1927, c. 47, s. 8; 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1933, c. 451, s. 1; 1935, c. 139; 1947, c. 990; 1953, c. 1209, ss. 2, 5; 1963, c. 793, s. 3; 1967, c. 789, s. 11; 1975, cc. 553, 850; 1983, c. 214, s. 5; 1989, c. 187, s. 7; 1995, c. 129, s. 13; 2002-29, s. 1; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-63; 1921, c. 4, s. 44; C.S., s. 220(s); 1993, c. 539, s. 418; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1995, c. 129, s. 14; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-64; 1921, c. 4, s. 45; C.S., s. 220(t); 1927, c. 47, s. 9; 1983, c. 214, s. 6; 1995, c. 296, s. 1; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-65; 1921, c. 4, s. 46; C.S., s. 220(u); repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

§ 53-66.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 214, s. 7.

§§ 53-67,
53-68.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

S. 53-67; 1921, c. 4, s. 48; C.S., s. 220(w); 1925, c. 170; 1965, c. 188; 1967, c. 789, s. 12; 1983, c. 24, ss. 1, 2; 1989, c. 187, s. 8; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 3; 2004-171, s. 2; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-68; 1923, c. 211, s. 1; C.S., s. 220(x); repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

§ 53-69.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1945, c. 635.

§§ 53-70,
53-71.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

S. 53-70; 1921, c. 20, s. 1; C.S., s. 220(z); 1971, c. 244, s. 1; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-71; 1921, c. 20, s. 2; C.S., s. 220(aa); repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

§ 53-72.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 244, s. 3.

§ 53-73.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

1921, c. 20, s. 4; C.S., s. 220(cc); 1971, c. 244, s. 2; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

§ 53-74.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 244, s. 3.

§§ 53-75 through 53-77.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

S. 53-75; 1929, c. 188, s. 1; 1981, c. 671, s. 11; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-76; 1929, c. 188, s. 2; 1981, c. 599, s. 19; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-77; 1933, c. 120, ss. 1, 2; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

§ 53-77.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 187, s. 9.

§ 53-77.1A.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

1989, c. 187, s. 10; 1995, c. 129, s. 15; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 556, s. 2; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

§ 53-77.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 319, s. 2.

§ 53-77.2A.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995 (Regular Session, 1996), c. 556, s. 1.

§ 53-77.3.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

1971, c. 465; 1985, c. 677, s. 5; 1989, c. 187, s. 12; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.